Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.155

Licensee—Recordkeeping—Director's access—Report requirement—Failure to report.

The licensee shall keep and use in the business such books, accounts, records, papers, documents, files, and other information as will enable the director to determine whether the licensee is complying with this chapter and with the rules adopted by the director under this chapter. The director shall have free access to such books, accounts, records, papers, documents, files, and other information wherever located. Every licensee shall preserve the books, accounts, records, papers, documents, files, and other information relevant to a loan for at least three years after making the final entry on any loan. No licensee or person subject to examination or investigation under this chapter shall withhold, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, or secrete any books, accounts, records, papers, documents, files, or other information.

Each licensee shall, on or before the first day of March of each year, file a report with the director giving such relevant information as the director may reasonably require concerning the business and operations of each licensed place of business conducted during the preceding calendar year. The report must be made under oath and must be in the form prescribed by the director, who shall make and publish annually an analysis and recapitulation of the reports. Every licensee that fails to file a report that is required to be filed by this chapter within the time required under this chapter is subject to a penalty of fifty dollars per day for each day's delay. The attorney general may bring a civil action in the name of the state for recovery of any such penalty.

[ 2013 c 29 s 8; 2001 c 81 s 12; 1994 c 92 s 170; 1991 c 208 s 16.]